HunSpellDictionaries/lv_LV.aff
SFX %   ērt   eramās     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erami      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramie     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramiem    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramo      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramos     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramu      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramus     [ē]rt

SFX e Y 25
SFX e   t   is      t
SFX e   t   uša     t
SFX e   t   ušam    t
SFX e   t   ušu     t
SFX e   t   ušā     t
SFX e   t   usi     t
SFX e   t   ušas    t
SFX e   t   ušai    t
SFX e   t   uši     t
SFX e   t   ušiem   t
SFX e   t   ušus    t
SFX e   t   ušos    t
SFX e   t   ušām    t
SFX e   t   ušās    t
SFX e   t   ušais   t
SFX e   t   ušajam  t
SFX e   t   ušo     t
SFX e   t   ušajā   t
SFX e   t   usī     t
SFX e   t   ušajai  t
SFX e   t   ušie    t
SFX e   t   ušajiem t
SFX e   t   ušajos  t
SFX e   t   ušajām  t
SFX e   t   ušajās  t

SFX 9 Y 177
SFX 9   t   is      [^gīklū]t
SFX 9   t   uša     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušam    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušu     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušā     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   usi     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušas    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušai    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   uši     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušiem   [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušus    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušos    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušām    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušās    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušais   [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajam  [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušo     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajā   [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   usī     [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajai  [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušie    [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajiem [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajos  [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajām  [^lūī]t
SFX 9   t   ušajās  [^lūī]t
SFX 9   kt  cis     [k]t
SFX 9   gt  dzis    [g]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvis      [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvuša     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušam    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušu     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušā     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvusi     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušas    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušai    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvuši     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušiem   [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušus    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušos    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušām    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušās    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušais   [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajam  [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušo     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajā   [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvusī     [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajai  [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušie    [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajiem [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajos  [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajām  [ū]t
SFX 9   ūt   uvušajās  [ū]t
SFX 9   īt   inis      [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inuša     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušam    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušu     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušā     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inusi     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušas    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušai    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inuši     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušiem   [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušus    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušos    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušām    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušās    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušais   [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajam  [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušo     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajā   [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inusī     [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajai  [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušie    [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajiem [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajos  [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajām  [ī]t
SFX 9   īt   inušajās  [ī]t
SFX 9   t   is      [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uša     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušam    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušu     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušā     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   usi     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušas    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušai    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uši     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušiem   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušus    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušos    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušām    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušās    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušais   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajam  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušo     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajā   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   usī     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajai  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušie    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajiem [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajos  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajām  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   ušajās  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlis      [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēluša     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušam    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušu     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušā     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlusi     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušas    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušai    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēluši     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušiem   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušus    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušos    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušām    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušās    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušais   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajam  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušo     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajā   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlusī     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajai  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušie    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajiem [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajos  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajām  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   ēlušajās  [e]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlis      [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īluša     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušam    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušu     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušā     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlusi     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušas    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušai    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īluši     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušiem   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušus    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušos    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušām    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušās    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušais   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajam  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušo     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajā   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlusī     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajai  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušie    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajiem [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajos  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajām  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   īlušajās  [i]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlis      [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūluša     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušam    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušu     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušā     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlusi     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušas    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušai    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūluši     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušiem   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušus    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušos    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušām    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušās    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušais   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajam  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušo     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajā   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlusī     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajai  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušie    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajiem [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajos  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajām  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ūlušajās  [u]lt

SFX b  Y 50
SFX b   t   jis      [^s]t
SFX b   t   juša     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušam    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušu     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušā     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jusi     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušas    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušai    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juši     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušiem   [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušus    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušos    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušām    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušās    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušais   [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajam  [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušo     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajā   [^s]t
SFX b   t   jusī     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajai  [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušie    [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajiem [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajos  [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajām  [^s]t
SFX b   t   jušajās  [^s]t
SFX b   st   dis      [s]t
SFX b   st   duša     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušam    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušu     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušā     [s]t
SFX b   st   dusi     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušas    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušai    [s]t
SFX b   st   duši     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušiem   [s]t
SFX b   st   dušus    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušos    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušām    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušās    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušais   [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajam  [s]t
SFX b   st   dušo     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajā   [s]t
SFX b   st   dusī     [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajai  [s]t
SFX b   st   dušie    [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajiem [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajos  [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajām  [s]t
SFX b   st   dušajās  [s]t


SFX I Y 23
SFX I  t    ts      t
SFX I  t    ta      t
SFX I  t    tai     t
SFX I  t    tais    t
SFX I  t    tajai   t
SFX I  t    tajam   t
SFX I  t    tajiem  t
SFX I  t    tajos   t
SFX I  t    tajā    t
SFX I  t    tajām   t
SFX I  t    tajās   t
SFX I  t    tam     t
SFX I  t    tas     t
SFX I  t    ti      t
SFX I  t    tie     t
SFX I  t    tiem    t
SFX I  t    to      t
SFX I  t    tos     t
SFX I  t    tus     t
SFX I  t    tā      t
SFX I  t    tām     t
SFX I  t    tās     t
SFX I  t    tu      t
