HunSpellDictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizkvēpt/+^eIB7JZ4M
aizliegt/%+9IB56
aizlocīt/+(IMBdgbJ{h[]1
aizmiegt/+%B69I5
aizplāksterēt/)+IH$bB1
aiztraukt/%I+6B59d][
aiztupt/+IMZR4B^Je7T[d]
aizvaskot/+)bI$BHJ1M
alternēt/b+MJ)HIB$1
apdegt/h+IB4Td(9J[8M}]
apdūkt/+%69IB5
apelpot/BI1+bJ$)MH
apgrābt/$+I)e6B4
aplenkt/9+6BI%5
aplipt/+IeBJ][4M7
aplišķēt/+JbH$BI)1M
apmīlēt/I+BhJ(1bCM
appirkt/+9IB47JM
apskurbt/B7e+^JIMZ4
apslaukt/+9%I6B5
apspīlēt/+)BJ1$IHbM
apstāvēt/(hb+IB1MJC
apsēkt/IB69%+5
aptraukt/+6%BI59
apģērbt/+BeI$)Td64][p
apšalkt/+%96BI5
apšļākt/+I%95B6
arhivēt/+G)dBb$HgJI{1M[p]
ataurēt/HMB+J$bI1
atbēgt/+(9IBhJ84M
atdziest/%+
atgrauzt/+e2IB46
atknibināt/hb+IB(MJC1
atkraukt/+9IB%65
atkāst/3JeIF
atlūkot/+{bJIBd)]gG[p1HM
atmaigt/^Z+JMBI94
atplūkt/+96%IB5
atsaukt/+dIB%695][
atsijāt/+IBHGbgJ[$).,Md{]p1
atskurbt/e+JIB7^4ZM
atspriegt/I9+%B65
attarkšķināt/+b[JhIBd(g{c1}CM]
attraukt/+%IdB96][5
attrenkt/+I%[9B5d6]
atvējot/+$I)b{[GgHpJdB1]M
atšķiebt/Bd)I+T46$e[]p
beigt/+I%[59Bd6J]M
bildināt/+(hBIMJ1bC
burt/+Id([h5B]6
drebināt/b+(gBI[JcMh1{]dC}
dziedēt/+I$M)dB[GgJHb1{]p
dzimt/+eIJ^B4Z7M
dīkt/+J95I%B6M
dūkt/MI%+6J]d95B[
gurkstēt/+b(IJ1hBMC
hermetizēt/)+b[$JdGBIgH1{Mp]
ieberzt/+2eI6B4
iegvelzt/+2BeI64
iejaukt/+[%5BdI96]
iekapāt/+IMJ$pb[dB)g1HG]{
ieklimst/N+%B4I7J
ieklīdināt/I+h(bBJM1C
iekāst/3+eIF
iemukt/+9IBJ7M4
ieplivināt/+JhI(1BCbM
ieraust/eT+hIF
ierūkt/+I[%dB9M5J]6
iesisināt/+hdMb(JcIg}BC[{]1
ieslaukt/9%+I6B5
iesvērt/+%BeI46
iesūkt/+%96][IdB5
ietupt/+^ReZIJ7dTB[4M]
ievākt/%+dB9I[56]
iečērkstēt/C(Jb+BMIh1
iešķilt/+I96B5
iežogot/b{H1gG$I)+[Bd]JMp
izbozt/+2ITed]B6[4
izdvašot/b+)JI$HBM1
izdīkt/J]95I%B[dM6
izdūkt/+I]%69Bd[5
izfasēt/bI)+$1BJMH
izgrābt/$e+IB)64
izlept/+BJIe^M4
izlēkāt/+$BdbHGJ{MI1]g[)p
izmaitāt/+GM)IJb{$HgdB[1p]
izmiegt/I%+B956
izmist/+M%eFIJ74
izrūkt/dB%9+I[5MJ]6
izsalt/+^eJI7B4MZ
izskūt/94+IB6
izsmacēt/+JbB)$HI1M
iztrenkt/+I9%6B5
izvajāt/g+IBbHG)[{J1$pdM]
izēdināt/h+bI1(MJBC
izģērbt/J$IeB)6TM]d[4p
izšļukt/9JIB4+M
kaist/+e%MJFI74
kapināt/+J(bBIhM1C
koriģēt/)H+b$gpIdGB{J[1M]
kust/+eFIJME8
laimēt/)+BIdG$gMb[1H{J]p
modelēt/BI$J+b1)HM
mērkt/%IBd+9J6M5[]
mūrēt/bB$IHJ)+M1
neaizdiegt/%9B
neapjozt/dBT[e]
neietriept/$)Be
nenoraukt/9B
nepabozt/dB]e[T
nesamalt/eB
neuzrūkt/9B
nobeigt/9%+I[dB56]
nocirpt/+Jd7B4TI]eM[
nodzesināt/Cc+Jh[(IgMbdB1}{]
nogaist/+%7IeFM4J
nojumt/+BeI)6$4
noklīst/+I%JEN7b
nolakot/bM+dJ)BI$[gGH]1{p
nolikt/79dBM+I4T[J]
nolipināt/c+(I{dBbMhgC[J]1}
nolipt/+eIJMB74
nopūt/+97BZ^I4JM
norūdīt/+ch1gI*&b({BdM]JC[
norūkt/+BI96%]d[5
nosalt/+B^eIZM7J4
nospringt/9+IZB^4MJ
nostīgot/+)$BMJIb1H
notriekt/I9B+d%65[]
notvarstīt/d+bIJ]h[BC(cMg1{
nočamdīt/h+J]({bcdBgI1M[C
nošūt/BI+946
ogot/BMI$+b)JdgG{H1][p
pabārt/+%6eIT][dB4
pabāzt/62+TdIBe4[]
pajādināt/bh+(1IBCMJ
paklejot/+b)IBJ1H$M
pakviekt/B+I9%65
pakvēpt/+e^4BI7ZMJ
pamīt/+%J9dBI[45M8]
panaglot/Ib)$+JBMH1
panitrēt/IbM+$BJH)1
paslampāt/Id+Jb)gB$H1{G[pM]
paspolēt/J+)bHIB$1M
paspraukt/+%dIB]96[5
pasprukt/7+JI94BM
pasērst/e+IF
pavīlēt/+bBIH)$1JM
pašalkt/+%96IB5
pašļircināt/+(IhbM1BJC
pažūt/+9I7MBZ^J4
piedzenāt/IB+$b)H1JM
piegvelzt/eI2+6B4
piekarst/+%IeFJM
piepaist/e+FI%74
pieplakt/+9B4I7JM
piepūžņot/b1+J)IMHB
pieraudzīt/+bBd[JIg{M1]
pierūkt/%+96I5B
pieveikt/+%B9I65
piezīst/I+2[b]T6E
post/+Ie3FT]
projektēt/[b)I1g+$BdpGJ{MH]
pārbraucīt/BI+(MbJ1
pārbrēkt/+9%Bd[I65]
pārcelt/+B96d][I5
pārkārdināt/hBI1(+b[dMJg}cC]{
pārlūzt/IeB+M4
pārmocīt/+1gbBIhM({dJ[]
pārmākt/69%+BI5
pārrūkt/%+dB[I9]65
pārslampāt/dB+Ib$GHg{J[)]1Mp
pārsūkt/+%Id[9B]65
pārēdināt/hbI+(CJ1BM
pārķemmēt/+)bJ$IHBM1
pāršķīt/BI89+JM4
pāržņaugt/+d%I9[5B6]
raust/e+FhIT
sabrošēt/+IM$)bBJ1H
sagāgāt/+)GJH$Ib{dMBg1]p[
sairt/+Id^ZTe[B7JM]4
sakaukt/B5I+%69d[]
saklīst/bI%+NE7J
sakonspirēt/+$)HbJMIB1
sapost/eJIFT]3
sapūšļot/+H$B)bI1JM
sasarkt/+^IB9JM4Z
sasegt/I+%9dB65][
saskūt/JIB69M4
satenterēt/+M)H$b1BIJ
savāzt/6+2IBe4
savērt/d+%6TeBI[4]
sazviegt/%6+5BI9d[]
sašņakstināt/+dBJhCc(g1Ib}[M{]
sekvestrēt/)bM+IB$H1J
sprūst/+JEbI%7N
stigt/+JBI7M94
tupt/e+ZT^R4BIM[dJ7]
urinēt/$+b1IBJHM)
uzbriest/%+Ib7JEN
uzdzenāt/+$)bJBI1MH
uzkult/+I69B5
uzlipt/I[BTe+7dJ]M4
uzpaist/4Ie%+F7
uzrasēt/+bIH)1JM$B
uztaukšķēt/)+bBI$MH1J
uztraukt/%+I9[Bd65]
uzveikt/I+95B6%
uzļimt/+^IeZM7BJ4
veltnēt/gH$)+GbI{MJ]1dB[p
ķērkt/%IBd+9J6M5[]
ņirgt/+d%I96J5B][M
žilbināt/h+cb(gMdBICJ1{][}
